North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-02.1 North Dakota Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act

19-02.1-01.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Advertisement” means all representations disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or which are likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics.

“Color” includes black, white, and intermediate grays.

“Color additive” means a material which:

Is a dye, pigment, or other substance made by a process of synthesis or similar artifice, or extracted, isolated, or otherwise derived, with or without intermediate or final change of identity from a vegetable, animal, mineral, or other source; or

When added or applied to a food, drug, or cosmetic, or to the human body or any part thereof, is capable, alone or through reaction with other substance, of imparting color thereto, except that such term does not include any material which has been or hereafter is exempted under the federal act.

“Contaminated with filth” applies to any food, drug, device, or cosmetic not securely protected from dust, dirt, and as far as may be necessary by all reasonable means, from all foreign or injurious contaminations.

“Cosmetic” means:

Articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance; or

Articles intended for use as a component of any such articles, except that such term does not include soap.

“Department” means the state department of health.

“Device”, except when used in the first paragraph following subsection 21 of this section and in subsection 10 of section 19-02.1-02, subsection 6 of section 19-02.1-10, subsections 3 and 16 of section 19-02.1-14, and subsection 3 of section 19-02.1-18, means instruments, apparatus and contrivances, including their components, parts, and accessories, intended:

For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals; or

To affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals.

“Drug” means:

Articles recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals;

Articles, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals; or

Articles intended for use as a component of any article specified in subdivision a, b, or c, but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories. Provided, however, that “drug”, for the purpose of this chapter, and as defined by this subsection, does not include those controlled substances or drugs regulated by or under the authority of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, with respect to such drugs, the Uniform Controlled Substances Act takes precedence over and supplants the provisions of this chapter only so far as its authority and control is synonymous with the provisions of this chapter.

“Federal act” means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as amended [21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.].

“Food” means:

Articles used for food or drink for man or other animals;

Chewing gum; and

Articles used for components of any such article.

“Food additive” means any substance, the intended use of which results or may be reasonably expected to result, directly or indirectly, in its becoming a component or otherwise affecting the characteristics of any food, including any substance intended for use in producing, manufacturing, packing, processing, preparing, treating, packaging, transporting, or holding food; and including any source of radiation intended for any such use, if such substance is not generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate its safety, as having been adequately shown through scientific procedures, or, in the case of a substance used in a food prior to January 1, 1958, through either scientific procedures or experience based on common use in food, to be safe under the conditions of its intended use, except that such term does not include:

A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity;

A pesticide chemical to the extent that it is intended for use or is used in the production, storage, or transportation of any raw agricultural commodity;

A color additive; or

Any substance used in accordance with a sanction or approval granted prior to the enactment of the Food Additives Amendment of 1958, pursuant to the federal act; the Poultry Products Inspection Act [21 U.S.C. 451 et seq.]; or the Meat Inspection Act of March 4, 1907 [34 Stat. 1260, as amended and extended, 21 U.S.C. 71 et seq.].

“Immediate container” does not include package liners.

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container of any article; and a requirement made by or under authority of this chapter that any word, statement, or other information appearing on the label may not be considered to be complied with unless such word, statement, or other information also appears on the outside container or wrapper, if any there be, of the retail package of such article, or is easily legible through the outside container or wrapper.

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter:

Upon an article or any of its containers or wrappers; or

Accompanying such article.

“Manufacture, compound, or process” includes repackaging or otherwise changing the container, wrapper, or labeling of any drug package in the furtherance of the distribution of the drug from the original place of manufacture to the person who makes final delivery or sale to the ultimate consumer, and the term “manufacturers, compounders, and processors” must be deemed to refer to persons engaged in such defined activities.

“New drug” means:

Any drug the composition of which is such that such drug is not generally recognized among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of drugs, as safe and effective for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof; or

Any drug the composition of which is such that such drug, as a result of investigations to determine its safety and effectiveness for use under such conditions, has become so recognized, but which has not, otherwise than in such investigations, been used to a material extent or for a material time under such conditions.

“Official compendium” means the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them.

“Person” includes individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, and association.

“Pesticide chemical” means any substance which, alone, in chemical combination, or in formulation with one or more other substances is a pesticide within the meaning of chapter 4.1-34, and which is used in the production, storage, or transportation of raw agricultural commodities.

“Practitioner” means an individual licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized by the jurisdiction in which the individual is practicing to prescribe drugs in the course of professional practice which are subject to this chapter.

“Raw agricultural commodity” means any food in its raw or natural state, including all fruits that are washed, colored, or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form prior to marketing.

If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading, or if an advertisement is alleged to be false because it is misleading, then in determining whether the labeling or advertisement is misleading, there must be taken into account, among other things, not only representations made or suggested by statement, word, design, device, sound, or in any combination thereof, but also the extent to which the labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts material in the light of such representations or material with respect to consequences which may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof or under such conditions of use as are customary or usual.

The representation of a drug, in its labeling or advertisement, as an antiseptic must be considered to be a representation that it is a germicide, except in the case of a drug purporting to be, or represented as, an antiseptic for inhibitory use as a wet dressing, ointment, dusting powder, or such other use as involves prolonged contact with the body.

The provisions of this chapter regarding the selling of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics must be considered to include the manufacture, production, processing, packing, exposure, offer, possession, and holding of any such article for sale; and the sale, dispensing, and giving of any such article and the supplying or applying of any such articles in the conduct of any food, drug, or cosmetic establishment.

Nothing in subsection 21 may be construed to apply to any pesticide chemical, soil or plant nutrient, or other agricultural chemical solely because of its effect in aiding, retarding, or otherwise affecting, directly or indirectly, the growth or other natural physiological process of produce of the soil and thereby affecting its color, whether before or after harvest.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 2; 1969, ch. 230, § 1; 1971, ch. 235, §§ 46, 49; 1985, ch. 258, § 11; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1999, ch. 379, § 1; 2017, ch. 67, § 10, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

City regulation of food retailers, see N.D.C.C. § 40-05-03.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 19-03.1.

19-02.1-01.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Advertisement” means all representations disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or which are likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics.

“Color” includes black, white, and intermediate grays.

“Color additive” means a material which:

Is a dye, pigment, or other substance made by a process of synthesis or similar artifice, or extracted, isolated, or otherwise derived, with or without intermediate or final change of identity from a vegetable, animal, mineral, or other source; or

When added or applied to a food, drug, or cosmetic, or to the human body or any part thereof, is capable, alone or through reaction with other substance, of imparting color thereto, except that such term does not include any material which has been or hereafter is exempted under the federal act.

“Contaminated with filth” applies to any food, drug, device, or cosmetic not securely protected from dust, dirt, and as far as may be necessary by all reasonable means, from all foreign or injurious contaminations.

“Cosmetic” means:

Articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance; or

Articles intended for use as a component of any such articles, except that such term does not include soap.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Device”, except when used in the first paragraph following subsection 21 of this section and in subsection 10 of section 19-02.1-02, subsection 6 of section 19-02.1-10, subsections 3 and 16 of section 19-02.1-14, and subsection 3 of section 19-02.1-18, means instruments, apparatus and contrivances, including their components, parts, and accessories, intended:

For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals; or

To affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals.

“Drug” means:

Articles recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals;

Articles, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or other animals; or

Articles intended for use as a component of any article specified in subdivision a, b, or c, but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories. Provided, however, that “drug”, for the purpose of this chapter, and as defined by this subsection, does not include those controlled substances or drugs regulated by or under the authority of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, with respect to such drugs, the Uniform Controlled Substances Act takes precedence over and supplants the provisions of this chapter only so far as its authority and control is synonymous with the provisions of this chapter.

“Federal act” means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as amended [21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.].

“Food” means:

Articles used for food or drink for man or other animals;

Chewing gum; and

Articles used for components of any such article.

“Food additive” means any substance, the intended use of which results or may be reasonably expected to result, directly or indirectly, in its becoming a component or otherwise affecting the characteristics of any food, including any substance intended for use in producing, manufacturing, packing, processing, preparing, treating, packaging, transporting, or holding food; and including any source of radiation intended for any such use, if such substance is not generally recognized, among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate its safety, as having been adequately shown through scientific procedures, or, in the case of a substance used in a food prior to January 1, 1958, through either scientific procedures or experience based on common use in food, to be safe under the conditions of its intended use, except that such term does not include:

A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity;

A pesticide chemical to the extent that it is intended for use or is used in the production, storage, or transportation of any raw agricultural commodity;

A color additive; or

Any substance used in accordance with a sanction or approval granted prior to the enactment of the Food Additives Amendment of 1958, pursuant to the federal act; the Poultry Products Inspection Act [21 U.S.C. 451 et seq.]; or the Meat Inspection Act of March 4, 1907 [34 Stat. 1260, as amended and extended, 21 U.S.C. 71 et seq.].

“Immediate container” does not include package liners.

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon the immediate container of any article; and a requirement made by or under authority of this chapter that any word, statement, or other information appearing on the label may not be considered to be complied with unless such word, statement, or other information also appears on the outside container or wrapper, if any there be, of the retail package of such article, or is easily legible through the outside container or wrapper.

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter:

Upon an article or any of its containers or wrappers; or

Accompanying such article.

“Manufacture, compound, or process” includes repackaging or otherwise changing the container, wrapper, or labeling of any drug package in the furtherance of the distribution of the drug from the original place of manufacture to the person who makes final delivery or sale to the ultimate consumer, and the term “manufacturers, compounders, and processors” must be deemed to refer to persons engaged in such defined activities.

“New drug” means:

Any drug the composition of which is such that such drug is not generally recognized among experts qualified by scientific training and experience to evaluate the safety and effectiveness of drugs, as safe and effective for use under the conditions prescribed, recommended, or suggested in the labeling thereof; or

Any drug the composition of which is such that such drug, as a result of investigations to determine its safety and effectiveness for use under such conditions, has become so recognized, but which has not, otherwise than in such investigations, been used to a material extent or for a material time under such conditions.

“Official compendium” means the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them.

“Person” includes individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, and association.

“Pesticide chemical” means any substance which, alone, in chemical combination, or in formulation with one or more other substances is a pesticide within the meaning of chapter 4.1-34, and which is used in the production, storage, or transportation of raw agricultural commodities.

“Practitioner” means an individual licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized by the jurisdiction in which the individual is practicing to prescribe drugs in the course of professional practice which are subject to this chapter.

“Raw agricultural commodity” means any food in its raw or natural state, including all fruits that are washed, colored, or otherwise treated in their unpeeled natural form prior to marketing.

If an article is alleged to be misbranded because the labeling is misleading, or if an advertisement is alleged to be false because it is misleading, then in determining whether the labeling or advertisement is misleading, there must be taken into account, among other things, not only representations made or suggested by statement, word, design, device, sound, or in any combination thereof, but also the extent to which the labeling or advertisement fails to reveal facts material in the light of such representations or material with respect to consequences which may result from the use of the article to which the labeling or advertisement relates under the conditions of use prescribed in the labeling or advertisement thereof or under such conditions of use as are customary or usual.

The representation of a drug, in its labeling or advertisement, as an antiseptic must be considered to be a representation that it is a germicide, except in the case of a drug purporting to be, or represented as, an antiseptic for inhibitory use as a wet dressing, ointment, dusting powder, or such other use as involves prolonged contact with the body.

The provisions of this chapter regarding the selling of food, drugs, devices, or cosmetics must be considered to include the manufacture, production, processing, packing, exposure, offer, possession, and holding of any such article for sale; and the sale, dispensing, and giving of any such article and the supplying or applying of any such articles in the conduct of any food, drug, or cosmetic establishment.

Nothing in subsection 21 may be construed to apply to any pesticide chemical, soil or plant nutrient, or other agricultural chemical solely because of its effect in aiding, retarding, or otherwise affecting, directly or indirectly, the growth or other natural physiological process of produce of the soil and thereby affecting its color, whether before or after harvest.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 2; 1969, ch. 230, § 1; 1971, ch. 235, §§ 46, 49; 1985, ch. 258, § 11; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1999, ch. 379, § 1; 2017, ch. 67, § 10, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 80, effective September 1, 2022.

19-02.1-02.
Prohibited acts.

The following acts and the causing thereof within the state of North Dakota are hereby prohibited:

The manufacture, sale, or delivery, holding or offering for sale of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded.

The adulteration or misbranding of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic.

The receipt in commerce of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded, and the delivery or proffered delivery thereof for pay or otherwise.

The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of any article in violation of section 19-02.1-11 or 19-02.1-16.

The dissemination of any false advertisement.

The refusal to permit entry or inspection, or to permit the taking of a sample, as authorized by section 19-02.1-21.

The giving of a guaranty or undertaking which guaranty or undertaking is false, except by a person who relied on a guaranty or undertaking to the same effect signed by, and containing the name and address of the person residing in the state of North Dakota from whom the person received in good faith the food, drug, device, or cosmetic.

The removal or disposal of a detained or embargoed article in violation of section 19-02.1-05.

The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or removal of the whole or any part of the labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to a food, drug, device, or cosmetic, if such act is done while such article is held for sale and results in such article being adulterated or misbranded.

Forging, counterfeiting, simulating, or falsely representing, or without proper authority using any mark, stamp, tag, label, or other identification device authorized or required by regulations promulgated under the provisions of this chapter or of the federal act.

The using, on the labeling of any drug or in any advertisement relating to such drug, of any representation or suggestion that an application with respect to such drug is effective under section 19-02.1-16 or that such drug complies with the provisions of such section.

In the case of a prescription drug distributed or offered for sale in this state, the failure of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor thereof to maintain for transmittal, or to transmit, to any practitioner licensed by applicable law to administer such drug who makes written request for information as to such drug, true and correct copies of all printed matter which is required to be included in any package in which that drug is distributed or sold, or such other printed matter as is approved under the federal act. Nothing in this subsection may be construed to exempt any person from any labeling requirement imposed by or under other provisions of this chapter.

Placing or causing to be placed upon any drug or device or container thereof, with intent to defraud, the trade name or other identifying mark, or imprint of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing; selling, dispensing, disposing of, or causing to be sold, dispensed, or disposed of, or concealing or keeping in possession, control, or custody, with intent to sell, dispense, or dispose of, any drug, device, or any container thereof, with knowledge that the trade name or other identifying mark or imprint of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing has been placed thereon in a manner prohibited by this subsection; or making, selling, disposing of, or causing to be made, sold, or disposed of, or keeping in possession, control, or custody, or concealing, with intent to defraud, any punch, die, plate, or other thing designed to print, imprint, or reproduce that trade name or other identifying mark or imprint of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing upon any drug, device, or container thereof.

Dispensing or causing to be dispensed a different drug or brand of drug in place of the drug or brand of drug ordered or prescribed without the express permission in each case of the person ordering or prescribing.

The manufacture of drugs, or the supplying of drugs at wholesale or retail, unless a license or permit to do so has first been obtained from the state board of pharmacy after application to the state board of pharmacy and the payment of a fee set by the state board of pharmacy.

The filling or refilling of any prescription in violation of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-15.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 3; 1969, ch. 230, § 2; 1971, ch. 235, § 49; 1979, ch. 187, § 27; 1981, ch. 249, § 1.

19-02.1-03.
Injunction proceedings.

In addition to the remedies hereinafter provided, the department is hereby authorized to apply to the district court of Burleigh County for, and such court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of section 19-02.1-02, irrespective of whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 4.

19-02.1-04.
Penalties and guaranty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsections 1 through 16 of section 19-02.1-02 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

No person shall be subject to the penalties of subsection 1, for having violated subsection 1 or 3 of section 19-02.1-02 if the person established a guaranty or undertaking signed by, and containing the name and address of, the person residing in the state of North Dakota from whom the person received in good faith the article, to the effect that such article is not adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of this chapter, designating this chapter.

No publisher, radio-broadcast licensee, or agency or medium for the dissemination of an advertisement, except the manufacturer, packer, distributor, or seller of the article to which a false advertisement relates, shall be liable under this section by reason of the dissemination by the person of such false advertisement, unless the person has refused, on the request of the department, to furnish the department the name and post-office address of the manufacturer, packer, distributor, seller, or advertising agency residing in the state of North Dakota who caused the person to disseminate such advertisement.

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 49.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 5; 1969, ch. 230, § 3; 1971, ch. 235, § 49; 1975, ch. 106, § 167; 1985, ch. 258, § 12; 1985, ch. 259, § 1.

Collateral References.

Products liability: toxic shock syndrome, 59 A.L.R.4th 50.

Construction and application of learned-intermediary doctrine, 57 A.L.R.5th 1.

19-02.1-05.
Seizure.

Whenever a duly authorized agent of the department finds or has probable cause to believe that any food, drug, device, or cosmetic is adulterated or so misbranded as to be dangerous or fraudulent, within the meaning of this chapter, the authorized agent shall affix to such article a tag or other appropriate marking, giving notice that such article is, or is suspected of being, adulterated or misbranded and has been detained or embargoed, and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of such article by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by such agent or the court. It is unlawful for any person to remove or dispose of such detained or embargoed article by sale or otherwise without such permission.

When an article detained or embargoed under subsection 1 has been found by such agent to be adulterated or misbranded, the authorized agent shall petition the judge of the district court in the county in which the article is detained or embargoed for a libel for condemnation of such article. When such agent has found that an article so detained or embargoed is not adulterated or misbranded, the authorized agent shall remove the tag or other marking.

If the court finds that a detained or embargoed article is adulterated or misbranded, such article must, after entry of the decree, be destroyed at the expense of the claimant thereof, under the supervision of such agent, and all court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses, must be taxed against the claimant of such article or the claimant’s agent; provided, that when the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the article, the court, after entry of the decrees and after such costs, fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond, conditioned that such article must be so labeled or processed, has been executed, may by order direct that such article be delivered to the claimant thereof for such labeling or processing under the supervision of an agent of the department. The expense of such supervision must be paid by the claimant. Such must be returned to the claimant of the article on the representation to the court by the department that the article is no longer in violation of this chapter, and that the expenses of such supervision have been paid.

Whenever an authorized agent of the department finds in any room, building, vehicle of transportation or other structure, any meat, seafood, poultry, vegetable, fruit, or other perishable articles which are unsound, or contain any filthy, decomposed, or putrid substance, or that may be poisonous or deleterious to health or otherwise unsafe, the same being hereby declared to be a nuisance, the department’s authorized agent shall forthwith condemn or destroy the same, or in any other manner render the same unsalable as human food.

Any person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company having an interest in the alleged article, equipment, or other thing proceeded against, or any person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company against whom a civil or criminal liability would exist if said merchandise is in violation of section 19-02.1-02 may, within twenty days following the seizure, appear and file answer to the complaint. The answer must allege the interest or liability of the party filing it. In all other respects, the issue must be made up as in other civil actions.

Any article, equipment, conveyance, or other thing condemned under this section must, after entry of the decree, be disposed of by destruction or sale as the court may, in accordance with the provisions of this section, direct and the proceeds thereof, if sold, less the legal costs and charges, must be paid to the treasurer of the state; but such article, equipment, or other thing may not be sold under such decree contrary to provisions of this chapter.

Whenever in any proceedings under this section the condemnation of any equipment or conveyance or other thing, other than a drug, is decreed, the court shall allow the claim of any claimant, to the extent of such claimant’s interest, for remission or mitigation of such forfeiture if such claimant proves to the satisfaction of the court all of the following:

The claimant has not committed or caused to be committed any prohibited act referred to in chapter 19-03.1 and has no interest in any drug or controlled substance referred to therein.

The claimant has an interest in such equipment, or other thing as owner or lienor or otherwise, acquired by the claimant in good faith.

The claimant at no time had any knowledge or reason to believe that such equipment, conveyance, or other thing was being or would be used in, or to facilitate, the violation of the laws of this state relating to depressant, stimulant, or hallucinogenic drugs or counterfeit drugs.

When a decree of condemnation is entered against the article, equipment, conveyance, or other thing, court costs and fees and storage and other proper expenses must be awarded against the person, if any, intervening as claimant of the article.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 6; 1969, ch. 230, § 4; 1971, ch. 235, §§ 45, 49; 1979, ch. 187, § 28; 1985, ch. 258, § 13; 1987, ch. 263, § 7; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Collateral References.

Propriety of state and local government health officers’ warrantless search — post-Camara cases, 53 A.L.R.4th 1168.

19-02.1-06.
Prosecutions — State’s attorney.

It is the duty of each state’s attorney, to whom the department or state board of pharmacy reports any violation of this chapter occurring in the state’s attorney’s county, to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the proper courts without delay and to be prosecuted in the manner required by law.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 7; 1969, ch. 230, § 5; 1985, ch. 258, § 14; 1985, ch. 259, § 2.

19-02.1-07.
Minor violations. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Nothing in this chapter may be construed as requiring the state department of health or the state board of pharmacy to report minor violations of this chapter for the institution of proceedings under this chapter whenever the state department of health or the state board of pharmacy believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 8; 1985, ch. 259, § 3; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

19-02.1-07.
Minor violations. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Nothing in this chapter may be construed as requiring the department or the state board of pharmacy to report minor violations of this chapter for the institution of proceedings under this chapter whenever the department or the state board of pharmacy believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 8; 1985, ch. 259, § 3; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 81, effective September 1, 2022.

19-02.1-08.
Food — Definitions and standards.

Whenever in the judgment of the department such action will promote honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, the department shall promulgate regulations fixing and establishing for any food or class of food a reasonable definition and standard of identity or reasonable standard of quality or fill of container. In prescribing a definition and standard of identity for any food or class of food in which optional ingredients are permitted, the department shall, for the purpose of promoting honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, designate the optional ingredients which must be named on the label. The definitions and standards so promulgated must conform so far as practicable to the definitions and standards promulgated under authority of the federal act.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 9.

19-02.1-09.
Food — Adulteration defined.

A food must be deemed to be adulterated for any of the following reasons:

If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added substance such food may not be considered adulterated under this clause if the quantity of such substance in such food does not ordinarily render it injurious to health.

If it bears or contains any added poisonous or added deleterious substance, other than one which is:

A pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity;

A food additive; or

A color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-12.

If it is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-12.

If it is or bears or contains, any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-12. Provided, that when a pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or tolerance prescribed under subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-12, and such raw agricultural commodity has been subjected to processing such as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling, the residue of such pesticide chemical remaining in or on such processed food may not, notwithstanding the provisions of section 19-02.1-12 and this subsection, be deemed unsafe if such residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has been removed to the extent possible in good manufacturing practice, and the concentration of such residue in the processed food when ready-to-eat, is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural commodity.

If it consists in whole or in part of a diseased, contaminated, filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance or if it is otherwise unfit for food.

If it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth or whereby it may have been rendered diseased, unwholesome, or injurious to health.

If it is the product of a diseased animal or an animal which has died otherwise than by slaughter or that has been fed upon the uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse.

If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents injurious to health.

If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted therefrom.

If any substance has been substituted wholly or in part therefor.

If damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner.

If any substance has been added thereto or mixed or packed therewith so as to increase its bulk or weight or reduce its quality or strength or make it appear better or of greater value than it is.

If it is confectionery and has partially or completely imbedded therein any non-nutritive object. This subsection does not apply in the case of any non-nutritive object if, in the judgment of the department as provided by rules, the object is of practical functional value to the confectionery product and would not render the product injurious or hazardous to health. This subsection does not apply to any confectionery, by reason of its containing less than one-half of one percent by volume of alcohol derived solely from the use of flavoring extracts. This subsection does not apply to a non-nutritive substance that is in or on confectionery by reason of its use for some practical functional purpose in the manufacture, packaging, or storage of such confectionery if the use of the substance does not promote deception of the consumer or otherwise result in adulteration or misbranding in violation of any provision of this chapter. To avoid or resolve uncertainty as to the application of this subsection, the department may issue rules allowing or prohibiting use of particular non-nutritive substances.

If it is or bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of subsection 1 of section 19-02.1-12.

If it has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation was in conformity with a regulation or exemption in effect pursuant to federal law.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 168, § 10; 1989, ch. 264, § 3.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, § 402(a)(c) [21 USCS 342(a)(3)] as to food deemed “adulterated” if it is filthy or the like or unfit for food, 45 A.L.R.2d 861.

Coloring matter as forbidden adulteration of food, 56 A.L.R.2d 1129.

Liability of packer, foodstore, or restaurant for causing trichinosis, 96 A.L.R.3d 451.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by foreign object in food or food product, 1 A.L.R.5th 1.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by spoilage, contamination, or other deleterious condition of food or food product, 2 A.L.R.5th 1.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by food product containing object related to, but not intended to be present in, product, 2 A.L.R.5th 189.